New York, session 2025-2026, S4195.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (a) of paragraph 1 of subdivision (c) of 2 section 301 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 444 of 3 the laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) A safety inspection shall be made with respect to the brakes; 5 steering mechanism; wheel alignment; lights, including but not limited 6 to the lights which are designed and placed on a vehicle for the purpose 7 of illuminating the vehicle's license plates; odometer; tire pressure; 8 seat safety belts; shoulder harness safety belts; any window which is 9 composed of, covered by or treated with any material which has a light 10 transmittance of less than seventy percent pursuant to section three 11 hundred seventy-five of this title; muffler or exhaust system pursuant 12 to paragraph (a) of subdivision thirty-one of section three hundred 13 seventy-five of this title and such other mechanisms and equipment as 14 shall be determined by the commissioner to be necessary for proper and 15 safe operations. Such inspection shall also be made with respect to 16 vehicle identification number. Upon inspection, the mileage appearing on 17 the odometer shall be recorded upon the inspection sticker. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 19 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03241-03-5